dictionaries/oc_FR/oc_FR.aff
SFX e Y 42
SFX e    gi       jas           [g]i
SFX e    gi       ja            [g]i
SFX e    gi       jan          [g]i
SFX e    gi       ge           [g]i
SFX e    gi       ges          [g]i
SFX e    gi       gen          [g]i
SFX e    i         as            [i]i
SFX e    i         a             [i]i
SFX e    i         an           [i]i
SFX e    i         e             [i]i
SFX e    i         es           [i]i
SFX e    i         en           [i]i
SFX e    ï         as               ï
SFX e    ï         a               ï
SFX e    ï         an              ï
SFX e    ï         e                ï
SFX e    ï         es              ï
SFX e    ï          en              ï
SFX e    i         as            [^g][^ug]i
SFX e    i         a             [^g][^ug]i
SFX e    i         an           [^g][^ug]i
SFX e    i         e            [^g][^ug]i
SFX e    i         es           [^g][^ug]i
SFX e    i         en           [^g][^ug]i
SFX e    ui       as           gui
SFX e    ui        a            gui
SFX e    ui        an          gui
SFX e    ui        e            gui
SFX e    ui        es           gui
SFX e    ui        en           gui
SFX e    qui      cas          qui
SFX e    qui      ca            qui
SFX e    qui      can           qui
SFX e   i     e           qui
SFX e   i     es          qui
SFX e   i     en          qui
SFX e   ci    ças          ci
SFX e   ci    ça           ci
SFX e   ci    çan          ci
SFX e   i     e           ci
SFX e   i     es          ci
SFX e   i     en          ci

SFX f Y 7
SFX f    i         as             avi
SFX f    i         a              avi
SFX f    avi     àvem        avi
SFX f    avi     àvetz        avi
SFX f    avi     avan         avi
SFX f    avi     am            avi
SFX f    avi     atz            avi

SFX g  Y 91
SFX g   çar     ci            [ç]ar
SFX g   ar      ui             [g]ar
SFX g   car    qui           [c]ar
SFX g   jar     gi            [j]ar
SFX g   ar      as             [gcçj]ar
SFX g   ar      a              [gcçj]ar
SFX g   ar      am           [gcçj]ar
SFX g   ar      atz           [gcçj]ar
SFX g   ar      an            [gcçj]ar
SFX g   ar      avi           [gcçj]ar
SFX g   ar      ava          [gcçj]ar
SFX g   ar      avas          [gcçj]ar
SFX g   ar      àvem       [gcçj]ar
SFX g   ar      àvetz       [gcçj]ar
SFX g   ar      avan        [gcçj]ar
SFX g   car    quèri         [c]ar
SFX g   car    quères       [c]ar
SFX g   car    quèt          [c]ar
SFX g   car    quèrem     [c]ar
SFX g   car    quèretz     [c]ar
SFX g   car    quèron      [c]ar
SFX g   çar    cèri          [ç]ar
SFX g   çar    cères        [ç]ar
SFX g   çar    cèt           [ç]ar
SFX g   çar    cèrem      [ç]ar
SFX g   çar    cèretz      [ç]ar
SFX g   çar    cèron       [ç]ar
SFX g   jar     gèri          [j]ar
SFX g  jar      gères        [j]ar
SFX g   jar     gèt           [j]ar
SFX g   jar     gèrem      [j]ar
SFX g   jar     gèretz      [j]ar
SFX g   jar     gèron       [j]ar
SFX g   ar      uèri          [g]ar
SFX g   ar      uères        [g]ar
SFX g   ar      uèt           [g]ar
SFX g   ar      uèrem      [g]ar
SFX g   ar      uèretz      [g]ar
SFX g   ar      uèron       [g]ar
SFX g   0      ai              [gcçj]ar
SFX g   0      às              [gcçj]ar
SFX g   0      à               [gcçj]ar
SFX g   0      em            [gcçj]ar
SFX g   0      etz             [gçcj]ar
SFX g   0      àn              [gcçj]ar
SFX g   0      iái              [gcçj]ar
SFX g   0      iás             [gcçj]ar
SFX g   0      iá               [gcçj]ar
SFX g   0      iam            [gcçj]ar
SFX g   0      iatz            [gcçj]ar
SFX g   0      ián             [gcçj]ar
SFX g   car   que            [c]ar
SFX g   car   ques          [c]ar
SFX g   car   quem         [c]ar
SFX g   car   quetz         [c]ar
SFX g   car   quen          [c]ar
SFX g   car   quèsse       [c]ar
SFX g   car   quèsses      [c]ar
SFX g   car   quèssem     [c]ar
SFX g   car   quèssetz     [c]ar
SFX g   car   quèsson      [c]ar
SFX g   jar   ge            [j]ar
SFX g   jar   ges          [j]ar
SFX g   jar   gem         [j]ar
SFX g   jar   getz         [j]ar
SFX g   jar   gen          [j]ar
SFX g   jar   gèsse       [j]ar
SFX g   jar   gèsses      [j]ar
SFX g   jar   gèssem     [j]ar
SFX g   jar   gèssetz     [j]ar
SFX g   jar   gèsson      [j]ar
SFX g   ar     ue              [g]ar
SFX g   ar     ues             [g]ar
SFX g   ar     uem             [g]ar
SFX g   ar     uetz             [g]ar
SFX g   ar     uen              [g]ar
SFX g   ar     uèsse           [g]ar
SFX g  ar     uèsses          [g]ar
SFX g   ar     uèssem         [g]ar
SFX g   ar     uèssetz         [g]ar
SFX g   ar     uèsson          [g]ar
SFX g   çar     ce              [ç]ar
SFX g   çar     ces             [ç]ar
SFX g   çar     cem             [ç]ar
SFX g   çar     cetz             [ç]ar
SFX g   çar     cen              [ç]ar
SFX g   çar     cèsse           [ç]ar
SFX g   çar     cèsses          [ç]ar
SFX g   çar     cèssem         [ç]ar
SFX g   çar     cèssetz         [ç]ar
SFX g   çar     cèsson          [ç]ar

SFX h Y 31
SFX h   at      ada               at
SFX h   at      adas              at
SFX h   0       s                   at
SFX h   at      ant                at
SFX h   ar      ada               ar
SFX h   ar      adas              ar
SFX h   ar      ant                ar
SFX h   ar      at                  ar
SFX h   ar      ats                ar
SFX h   it       ida                it
SFX h   it       issent            it
SFX h   0       s                    it
SFX h   ir       ida                ir
SFX h   ir       idas               ir
SFX h   ir       issent            ir
SFX h   ir       it                   ir
SFX h   ir       its                  ir
SFX h   ut      uts                ut
SFX h   ut      uda               ut
SFX h   ut      udas             ut
SFX h   ut      ent               ut
SFX h   ït       ida                ït
SFX h   ït       ïssent            ït
SFX h   re       ent               re
SFX h   ure   vent               iure
SFX h   ire    sent               [aeu]ire
SFX h   re     sent               [rdf]ire
SFX h   re     sent               ure
SFX h   er     ent                 er
SFX h   e       ent                ne
SFX h   és      esa               és

SFX i  Y 42 
SFX i    r     ssi           [iï]r
SFX i    r     sses          [iï]r
SFX i   ir     ís             [i]r
SFX i   ïr     ís             [ï]r
SFX i   ir     ís             [ui]r
SFX i   r      ssèm      [iï]r
SFX i   r     ssetz      [iï]r
SFX i   r     sson       [iï]r
SFX i   r     ssiái      [iï]r
SFX i   r     ssiá       [iï]r
SFX i   r     ssiás      [iï]r
SFX i   r     ssiam      [iï]r
SFX i   r     ssiatz     [iï]r
SFX i   r     ssian       [iï]r
SFX i   r     guèri       [iï]r
SFX i   r     guères     [iï]r
SFX i   r     guèt       [iï]r
SFX i   r     guèrem    [iï]r
SFX i   r     guèretz    [iï]r
SFX i   r     guèron     [iï]r
SFX i   r     rai            [iï]r
SFX i   r     ràs           [iï]r
SFX i   r     rà             [iï]r
SFX i   r     rem          [iï]r
SFX i   r     retz          [iï]r
SFX i   r     ràn           [iï]r
SFX i   r     riái           [iï]r
SFX i   r     riás           [iï]r
SFX i   r     riá            [iï]r
SFX i   r     riam         [iï]r
SFX i   r     riatz          [iï]r
SFX i   r     rián           [iï]r
SFX i   r     sca            [iï]r
SFX i   r     scas          [iï]r
SFX i   r     scam        [iï]r
SFX i   r     scatz         [iï]r
SFX i   r     scan           [iï]r
SFX i   r     guèsse       [iï]r
SFX i   r     guèsses      [iï]r
SFX i   r     guèssem    [iï]r
SFX i   r     guèssetz    [iï]r
SFX i   r     guèsson     [iï]r
