dictionaries/oc_FR/oc_FR.dic
ablanquesir/MTLQNi
aboriavi/f
abòrii/e
aboscassir/MTLQNi
abòsqui/MTLQNe
abreçavi/f
abrèci/e
abrocavi/MTLQNf
abrògui/e
abstengut/h
acalorir/MTLQNi
achorrir/MTLQNi
acoissavi/MTLQNf
acolonjar/MTLQNg
acomodat/h
aconsomir/MTLQNi
acròqui/MTLQNe
adolentir/MTLQNi
afasendat/h
afatonir/MTLQNi
aflocavi/MTLQNf
aflòqui/MTLQNe
afolastrir/MTLQNi
agacejar/MTLQNg
agandir/MTLQNi
agavelat/h
aglotonir/MTLQNi
agregavi/f
agrègui/e
agreulir/MTLQNi
ajustat/h
alabardir/MTLQNi
albergavi/f
albèrgui/e
allegavi/f
allègui/e
alonhavi/MTLQNf
alòtgi/MTLQNe
alusentir/MTLQNi
amagençar/MTLQNg
amagençat/h
amenir/MTLQNi
amortesit/h
anantir/MTLQNi
anocavi/MTLQNf
anojavi/MTLQNf
anuègi/MTLQNe
apartesir/MTLQNi
apastencar/MTLQNg
apetitir/MTLQNi
apilocavi/MTLQNf
apimpat/h
apoiridir/MTLQNi
aprècii/e
arpat/h
arpegar/MTLQNg
arracapesir/MTLQNi
arrocavi/MTLQNf
arrosentir/MTLQNi
asorat/h
assètgi/MTLQNe
assetjavi/MTLQNf
assistir/MTLQNi
assucar/MTLQNg
atebesir/MTLQNi
atèdii/e
atemat/h
atocavi/MTLQNf
atransir/MTLQNi
avalancat/h
avarejar/MTLQNg
avogavi/f
avògui/e
avorrir/MTLQNi
bajocavi/f
balotar/bh
bandejar/gh
bascar/gh
beatificar/gh
belugar/gh
bercavi/f
bèrqui/e
blasinejar/gh
blavir/ih
blesir/ih
boçavi/f
bòci/e
bondolejar/gh
borrinar/ah
brandolhejar/gh
breçavi/f
brèci/e
brolhavi/f
brondilhar/ah
brueissejar/gh
brunhir/ih
buget/sboget/s
caboçavi/f
caçar/gh
caïmar/ah
campanejar/gh
capolar/ah
carrugar/gh
caumosir/ih
cauterizar/ah
champejar/gh
cigalejar/gh
clocar/gh
clocavi/f
closcavi/f
clòsqui/e
cobrir/ih
coitar/ah
collocavi/f
comercejar/gh
comprimir/ih
consentir/jh
consomir/ih
convocavi/f
convòqui/e
costejar/gh
cotir/ih
cotrejar/gh
cròci/e
damejar/gh
dardejunar/ah
defalhir/ih
delagavi/f
dementir/ih
demiègi/e
depintar/ah
desacrocavi/f
desafògui/e
desaïr/ih
desarnescar/gh
desassasonar/ah
desbèfii/e
desboçavi/f
desburrar/ah
descarpitar/ih
descavalgar/gh
descodar/bh
descrocavi/f
descròci/e
descubrir/ih
desembèstii/e
desemplenar/ah
desengrepesir/ih
desentrafegar/gh
desesperar/bh
desflocavi/f
desflòqui/e
desgarambir/ih
desgrunar/ah
desjogavi/f
desjògui/e
desmasticar/gh
desnogalhar/ah
desolhavi/f
desontir/ih
desòrrii/e
despocelar/bh
desrocavi/f
desròqui/e
desruscar/gh
destamar/ah
destinguir/ih
detalhar/ah
digerir/ih
dissèqui/e
divorciavi/f
docir/ih
dometjar/gh
ebglotat/h
embabotir/MTLQNi
embailencar/MTLQNg
embastat/h
embèrqui/MTLQNe
emboçavi/MTLQNf
emboèmii/e
embordir/MTLQNi
embroissavi/f
embruèissi/e
embrulhegar/MTLQNg
embrumassat/h
empegosir/MTLQNi
empilat/h
encaresir/MTLQNi
encarrelat/h
encloscavi/MTLQNf
enclòsqui/MTLQNe
encrancar/MTLQNg
encubertat/h
endusir/MTLQNi
enfistrat/h
engaumir/MTLQNi
engautejar/MTLQNg
engavelat/h
engloriavi/MTLQNf
englòrii/MTLQNe
enjuèlhi/e
ennegavi/MTLQNf
enrampesir/MTLQNi
enromegavi/MTLQNf
ensòqui/MTLQNe
entaulat/h
entecar/MTLQNg
entreferir/MTLQNi
esbalançar/MTLQNg
esbèrqui/MTLQNe
escabelat/h
escaucir/MTLQNi
escoissavi/f
escòtii/e
escupinhejar/MTLQNg
esfolhavi/f
esfregir/MTLQNi
esfuèlhi/e
esparrancar/MTLQNg
espeçavi/MTLQNf
espècii/e
espeluquejat/h
espiugar/MTLQNg
establir/MTLQNi
estiralhat/h
estocavi/MTLQNf
estòqui/MTLQNe
estranjar/MTLQNg
esvanesir/MTLQNi
fantaumejar/gh
fatigar/gh
ferrejar/gh
fliscar/gh
flòqui/e
focavi/f
forabandir/ih
fortunejar/gh
fòtgi/e
fotjavi/f
fraulejar/gh
fulhetejar/gh
gargalhejar/gh
glopar/ah
gòbii/e
gordejar/gh
gòrgi/e
gorjavi/f
gronhir/ih
guinhejar/gh
infligit/h
jogavi/f
jògui/e
laganhejar/gh
laucejar/gh
lepir/ih
liardejar/gh
luscar/gh
martejar/gh
mesclejar/gh
miricocar/gh
multiplicar/gh
necavi/f
negòcii/e
nomençar/gh
notar/bh
ofrir/MTLQNi
òlii/e
oscavi/MTLQNf
pacanejar/gh
palpugar/gh
parafuèlhi/e
parquejar/gh
passarilhar/ah
pepiejar/gh
perforçavi/f
pèrgui/e
pimpalhar/ah
planhir/ih
plorassejar/gh
pòrgi/e
porjavi/f
prostituir/ih
provocavi/f
provòqui/e
punir/ih
racar/gh
rebatar/ah
rebrolhavi/f
rebruèlhi/e
rebugar/gh
reclantir/ih
recocavi/f
recòqui/e
refusar/ah
regemir/ih
regòrgi/e
reguergavi/f
remèdii/e
remerciavi/f
rèqui/e
requincar/gh
rescapar/ah
resclansir/ih
retocavi/f
retruèlhi/e
retunir/ih
revojavi/f
rondinejar/gh
ròqui/e
rossinholejar/gh
secotir/ih
sedejar/gh
separtir/ih
sinhocavi/f
solilòqui/e
soplojavi/f
subdelègui/e
subrogavi/f
sufòqui/e
superar/bh
suprimir/ih
tamponejar/gh
terçavi/f
tèrcii/e
tintar/ah
tossinejar/gh
trasmiègi/e
trasvojavi/f
trebolir/ih
tresgirar/ah
trojavi/f
tròqui/e
trucar/gh
verguetar/ah
virolejar/gh
vojavi/f
vuègi/e
